Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.365

Washington state legacy project—Funding—Rules.

The secretary of state may fund Washington state legacy project activities through donations as provided in RCW 43.07.037. The activities may include, but not be limited to, conducting interviews, preparing and indexing transcripts, publishing transcripts and photographs, and presenting displays and programs. Donations that do not meet the criteria of the Washington state legacy project may not be accepted. The secretary of state shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

[ 2008 c 222 s 11; 2002 c 358 s 3.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2008 c 222: See note following RCW 44.04.320.